Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.050

Housing financing powers—Annual audit.

(1) In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this chapter, and in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter to provide decent, safe, sanitary, and affordable housing for eligible persons, the commission is empowered to:

(a) Issue bonds in accordance with this chapter;

(b) Invest in, purchase, or make commitments to purchase or take assignments from mortgage lenders of mortgages or mortgage loans;

(c) Make loans to or deposits with mortgage lenders for the purpose of making mortgage loans;

(d) Make loans for down payment assistance to homebuyers in conjunction with other commission programs; and

(e) Participate fully in federal and other governmental programs and to take such actions as are necessary and consistent with this chapter to secure to itself and the people of the state the benefits of those programs and to meet their requirements, including such actions as the commission considers appropriate in order to have the interest payments on its bonds and other obligations treated as tax exempt under the code.

(2) The commission shall establish eligibility standards for eligible persons, considering at least the following factors:

(a) Income;

(b) Family size;

(c) Cost, condition, and energy efficiency of available residential housing;

(d) Availability of decent, safe, and sanitary housing;

(e) Age or infirmity; and

(f) Applicable federal, state, and local requirements.

The state auditor shall audit the books, records, and affairs of the commission annually to determine, among other things, if the use of bond proceeds complies with the general plan of housing finance objectives including compliance with the objective for the use of financing assistance for implementation of cost-effective energy efficiency measures in dwellings.

[ 2013 c 13 s 1; 1986 c 264 s 1; 1983 c 161 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 13: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 17, 2013]." [ 2013 c 13 s 2.]